New Jersey, session 222, S1246.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Upon proper application, the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall issue Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates for any motor vehicle owned or leased and registered in the State.  In addition to the registration number and other markings or identification otherwise prescribed by law, the license plate shall display appropriate words or a slogan and an emblem honoring the Ancient Order of Hibernians.  The chief administrator shall select the design, including an emblem and color scheme, in consultation with the Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board.  Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 3 of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes, except as hereinafter otherwise specifically provided. b.    Application for issuance of an Ancient Order of Hibernians license plate shall be made to the chief administrator on forms and in a manner prescribed by the chief administrator. In order to be deemed complete, an application shall be accompanied by a fee of $50, payable to the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, which shall be in addition to the fees otherwise prescribed by law for the registration of a motor vehicle.  The chief administrator shall collect annually, subsequent to the year of issuance of the Ancient Order of Hibernians license plate, a $10 fee for the license plate in addition to the fees otherwise prescribed by law for the registration of a motor vehicle.  The additional fees required by this subsection shall be deposited in the Ancient Order of Hibernians License Plate Fund created pursuant to subsection c. of this section. c.    There is created in the Department of the Treasury a special non-lapsing fund to be known as the Ancient Order of Hibernians License Plate Fund.  There shall be deposited in the fund the amount collected from all license plate fees collected pursuant to subsection b. of this section, less the amounts necessary to reimburse the commission for administrative costs pursuant to subsection d. of this section. Monies deposited in the fund shall be appropriated annually to the Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board.  Monies deposited in the fund shall be held in interest-bearing accounts in public depositories as defined pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1970, c.236 (C.17:9-41), and may be invested or reinvested in such securities as are approved by the State Treasurer.  Interest or other income earned on monies deposited in the fund, and any monies which may be appropriated or otherwise become available for the purposes of the fund, shall be credited to and deposited in the fund for use as set forth in P.L. , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). d.    Prior to the deposit of the additional fees collected pursuant to subsection b. of this section into the fund, amounts thereof as are necessary shall be used to reimburse the commission for all costs reasonably and actually incurred, as stipulated by the chief administrator, for: (1)  producing, issuing, renewing, and publicizing the availability of the Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates; and (2)  any computer programming changes that may be initially necessary to implement the Ancient Order of Hibernians license plate program established by P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), in an amount not to exceed $150,000. The chief administrator shall annually certify to the State Treasurer the average cost per license plate incurred in the immediately preceding year by the commission in producing, issuing, renewing, and publicizing the availability of the Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates.  The annual certification of the average cost per license plate shall be approved by the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, or its successor. In the event that the average cost per license plate as certified by the chief administrator and approved by the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, or its successor, is greater than the $50 application fee established in subsection b. of this section in two consecutive fiscal years, the chief administrator may discontinue the issuance of Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates. e.    The chief administrator shall notify eligible motorists of the opportunity to obtain Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates by publicizing the availability of the license plates on the website of the commission.  The Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board, and any other individual or entity designated by the Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board, may publicize the availability of Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates in any manner the Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board deems appropriate. f.     The chief administrator and the Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board shall develop and enter into a memorandum of agreement setting forth the procedures to be followed in carrying out their respective responsibilities under P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). g.    The Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board shall appoint a representative who shall act as a liaison between the organization and the commission.  The liaison shall represent the Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board in any and all communications with the commission regarding the Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates established by  P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.    a.  No State or other public funds shall be used by the commission for the initial cost of: (1)  producing, issuing, and publicizing the availability of Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates; or (2)  any computer programming changes which may be necessary to implement the Ancient Order of Hibernians license plate program established by P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    The Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board or other individual or entity designated by the Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board, shall contribute monies in an amount to be determined by the chief administrator, not to exceed a total of $25,000, to be used to offset the initial costs incurred by the commission for producing, issuing, and publicizing the availability of Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates, and any computer programming which may be necessary to implement the program.  To further help offset the initial costs incurred by the commission for the special license plates authorized by P.L. , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), other concerned organizations and individual donors may contribute monies to the Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board, or an individual or entity designated by the Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board, for this purpose.  Any amount remaining after the payment of the initial costs shall be deposited in the Ancient Order of Hibernians License Plate Fund established pursuant to subsection c. of section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). c.    The commission shall not begin designing, producing, issuing, or publicizing the availability of Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates, or making any necessary programming changes, until the following requirements have been met: (1)  The Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board or the individual or entity designated by the Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board, has provided the commission with the money necessary, as determined by the chief administrator pursuant to subsection b. of this section, to offset the initial costs incurred by the commission in establishing the Ancient Order of Hibernians license plate program; and (2)  The liaison appointed by the Ancient Order of Hibernians, New Jersey State Board pursuant to subsection g. of section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) has provided the commission with not less than 500 completed applications for Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates. These applications shall constitute the initial order for Ancient Order of Hibernians license plates and shall be accompanied by a fee representing the total cost of the initial order. Such fee shall be determined by multiplying the number of sets of license plates being ordered by the applicable initial fee for each set of license plates as set forth in subsection b. of section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3.    This act shall take effect immediately, but shall remain inoperable until the first day of the seventh month following the date on which the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection c. of section 2 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) have been satisfied.  The chief administrator may take such anticipatory acts in advance of that date as may be necessary for the timely implementation of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill)) shall expire if the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection c. of section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) are not satisfied by the last day of the 12th month following enactment.